Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.095

Findings—Developmental disabilities.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

The legislature finds that among those persons who endanger the safety of others by committing crimes are a small number of persons with developmental disabilities. While their conduct is not typical of the vast majority of persons with developmental disabilities who are responsible citizens, for their own welfare and for the safety of others the state may need to exercise control over those few dangerous individuals who are developmentally disabled, have been charged with crimes that involve a threat to public safety or security, and have been found either incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity. The legislature finds, however, that the use of civil commitment procedures under chapter 71.05 RCW to effect state control over dangerous developmentally disabled persons has resulted in their commitment to institutions for the mentally ill. The legislature finds that existing programs in mental institutions may be inappropriate for persons who are developmentally disabled because the services provided in mental institutions are oriented to persons with mental illness, a condition not necessarily associated with developmental disabilities. Therefore, the legislature believes that, where appropriate, and subject to available funds, persons with developmental disabilities who have been charged with crimes that involve a threat to public safety or security and have been found incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity should receive state services addressing their needs, that such services must be provided in conformance with an individual habilitation plan, and that their initial treatment should be separate and discrete from treatment for persons involved in any other treatment or habilitation program in a manner consistent with the needs of public safety.

[ 1998 c 297 s 28; 1989 c 420 s 1. Formerly RCW 10.77.005.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.